Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 5. Domestication.

§79-37-501.
Domestication authorized.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, by complying with this article, a domestic entity may become a domestic entity of the same type of entity in a foreign jurisdiction if the domestication is authorized by the law of the foreign jurisdiction.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, by complying with the provisions of this article applicable to foreign entities a foreign entity may become a domestic entity of the same type of entity in this state if the domestication is authorized by the law of the foreign entity’s jurisdiction of formation.

If a protected agreement contains a provision that applies to a merger of a domestic entity but does not refer to a domestication, the provision applies to a domestication of the entity as if the domestication were a merger until the provision is amended after January 1, 2015.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 26, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§79-37-502.
Plan of domestication.

A domestic entity may become a foreign entity in a domestication by approving a plan of domestication.The plan must be in a record and contain:

The name and type of entity of the domesticating entity;

The name and jurisdiction of formation of the domesticated entity;

The manner of converting the interests in the domesticating entity into interests, securities, obligations, money, other property, rights to acquire interests or securities, or any combination of the foregoing;

The proposed public organic record of the domesticated entity if it is a filing entity;

The full text of the private organic rules of the domesticated entity that are proposed to be in a record;

The other terms and conditions of the domestication; and

Any other provision required by the law of this state or the organic rules of the domesticating entity.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (a), a plan of domestication may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 27, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§79-37-503.
Approval of domestication.

A plan of domestication is not effective unless it has been approved:

By a domestic domesticating entity:

In a record, by each interest holder of a domestic domesticating entity that will have interest holder liability for debts, obligations, and other liabilities that arise after the domestication becomes effective, unless, in the case of an entity that is not a business corporation or nonprofit corporation:

In accordance with the requirements, if any, in its organic rules for approval of a domestication;

If its organic rules do not provide for approval of a domestication, in accordance with the requirements, if any, in its organic law and organic rules for approval of:

In the case of an entity that is not a business corporation, a merger, as if the domestication were a merger;

In the case of a business corporation, a merger requiring approval by a vote of the interest holders of the business corporation, as if the domestication were that type merger; or

By all of the interest holders of the entity entitled to vote on or consent to any matter if in the case of an entity that is not a business corporation, neither its organic law nor organic rules provide for approval of a domestication or a merger; and

The organic rules of the entity in a record provide for the approval of a domestication or merger in which some or all of its interest holders become subject to interest holder liability by the vote or consent of fewer than all of the interest holders; and

The interest holder consented in a record to or voted for that provision of the organic rules or became an interest holder after the adoption of that provision.

A domestication of a foreign domesticating entity is not effective unless it is approved in accordance with the law of the foreign entity’s jurisdiction of formation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 28, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§79-37-504.
Amendment or abandonment of plan of domestication.

A plan of domestication of a domestic domesticating entity may be amended:

In the same manner as the plan was approved, if the plan does not provide for the manner in which it may be amended; or

By its governors or interest holders in the manner provided in the plan, but an interest holder that was entitled to vote on or consent to approval of the domestication is entitled to vote on or consent to any amendment of the plan that will change:

A statement that the domestication has been abandoned in accordance with this section.

The amount or kind of interests, securities, obligations, money, other property, rights to acquire interests or securities, or any combination of the foregoing, to be received by any of the interest holders of the domesticating entity under the plan;

The public organic record, if any, or private organic rules of the domesticated entity that will be in effect immediately after the domestication becomes effective, except for changes that do not require approval of the interest holders of the domesticated entity under its organic law or organic rules; or

Any other terms or conditions of the plan, if the change would adversely affect the interest holder in any material respect.

After a plan of domestication has been approved by a domestic domesticating entity and before a statement of domestication becomes effective, the plan may be abandoned as provided in the plan.Unless prohibited by the plan, a domestic domesticating entity may abandon the plan in the same manner as the plan was approved.

If a plan of domestication is abandoned after a statement of domestication has been delivered to the Secretary of State for filing and before the statement becomes effective, a statement of abandonment, signed by the entity, must be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing before the statement of domestication becomes effective.The statement of abandonment takes effect on filing, and the domestication is abandoned and does not become effective.The statement of abandonment must contain:

The name of the domesticating entity;

The date on which the statement of domestication was filed by the Secretary of State; and

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 29, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§79-37-505.
Statement of domestication; effective date.

A statement of domestication must be signed by the domesticating entity and delivered to the Secretary of State for filing.

A statement of domestication must contain:

The name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of the domesticating entity;

The name and jurisdiction of formation of the domesticated entity;

If the statement of domestication is not to be effective upon filing, the later date and time on which it will become effective, which may not be more than ninety (90) days after the date of filing;

If the domesticating entity is a domestic entity, a statement that the plan of domestication was approved in accordance with this article or, if the domesticating entity is a foreign entity, a statement that the domestication was approved in accordance with the law of its jurisdiction of formation;

If the domesticated entity is a domestic filing entity, its public organic record, as an attachment;

If the domesticated entity is a domestic limited liability partnership, its statement of qualification, as an attachment;

If the domesticated entity is a foreign entity that is not a registered foreign entity, a mailing address to which the Secretary of State may send any process served on the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 79-37-506(e);

If the domesticated entity is a foreign entity, a copy of the filed domestication documents from the new jurisdiction as an attachment; and

If the domesticated entity is a domestic entity, a certificate of good standing or certificate of existence from its jurisdiction of formation that is issued less than one hundred eighty (180) days before filing under this section.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (b), a statement of domestication may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

If the domesticated entity is a domestic entity, its public organic record, if any, must satisfy the requirements of the law of this state, but the public organic record does not need to be signed and may omit any provision that is not required to be included in a restatement of the public organic record.

A plan of domestication that is signed by a domesticating domestic entity and meets all of the requirements of subsection (b) may be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing instead of a statement of domestication and on filing has the same effect. If a plan of domestication is filed as provided in this subsection, references in this chapter to a statement of domestication refer to the plan of domestication filed under this subsection.

A statement of domestication is effective on the date and time of filing or the later date and time specified in the statement of domestication.

A domestication in which the domesticated entity is a domestic entity is effective when the statement of domestication is effective. A domestication in which the domesticated entity is a foreign entity is effective on the later of:

The date and time provided by the organic law of the domesticated entity; or

When the statement is effective.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 30; Laws, 2017, ch. 308, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment added (b)(8) and (9), and made related stylistic changes.

§79-37-506.
Effect of domestication.

When a domestication becomes effective:

The domesticated entity is:

All property of the domesticating entity continues to be vested in the domesticated entity without transfer, reversion, or impairment;

All debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the domesticating entity continue as debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the domesticated entity;

Except as otherwise provided by law or the plan of domestication, all of the rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes of the domesticating entity remain in the domesticated entity;

The name of the domesticated entity may be substituted for the name of the domesticating entity in any pending action or proceeding;

If the domesticated entity is a filing entity, its public organic record is effective;

If the domesticated entity is a limited liability partnership, its statement of qualification is effective simultaneously;

The private organic rules of the domesticated entity that are to be in a record, if any, approved as part of the plan of domestication are effective; and

The interests in the domesticating entity are converted to the extent and as approved in connection with the domestication, and the interest holders of the domesticating entity are entitled only to the rights provided to them under the plan of domestication and to any appraisal rights they have under Section 79-37-109 and the domesticating entity’s organic law.

Organized under and subject to the organic law of the domesticated entity; and

The same entity without interruption as the domesticating entity;

Except as otherwise provided in the organic law or organic rules of the domesticating entity, the domestication does not give rise to any rights that an interest holder, governor, or third party would have upon a dissolution, liquidation, or winding up of the domesticating entity.

When a domestication becomes effective, a person that did not have interest holder liability with respect to the domesticating entity and that becomes subject to interest holder liability with respect to a domestic entity as a result of the domestication has interest holder liability only to the extent provided by the organic law of the entity and only for those debts, obligations, and other liabilities that arise after the domestication becomes effective.

When a domestication becomes effective, the interest holder liability of a person that ceases to hold an interest in a domestic domesticating entity with respect to which the person had interest holder liability is subject to the following rules:

The domestication does not discharge any interest holder liability under the organic law of a domesticating domestic entity to the extent the interest holder liability arose before the domestication became effective.

A person does not have interest holder liability under the organic law of the domestic domesticating entity for any debt, obligation, or other liability that arises after the domestication becomes effective.

The organic law of a domestic domesticating entity continues to apply to the release, collection, or discharge of any interest holder liability preserved under paragraph (1) as if the domestication had not occurred.

A person has whatever rights of contribution from any other person as are provided by other law or the organic rules of the domestic domesticating entity with respect to any interest holder liability preserved under paragraph (1) as if the domestication had not occurred.

When a domestication becomes effective, a foreign entity that is the domesticated entity may be served with process in this state for the collection and enforcement of any of its debts, obligations, and other liabilities in accordance with applicable law.

If a domesticating entity is a registered foreign entity, the registration to do business in this state of the domesticating entity is canceled when the domestication becomes effective.

A domestication does not require the entity to wind up its affairs and does not constitute or cause the dissolution of the entity.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 31, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.